Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-433
Building plans; duty of architects or draftsmen; violation; penalty.

All architects or draftsmen in preparing plans, specifications or drawings to be used in the erection, repairing, altering or removing of any building or structure within the terms and provisions of sections 48-425 to 48-435, shall provide in such plans, specifications and drawings for all the permanent structural features or requirements specified in said sections. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1911, c. 65, § 9, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 3610;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 29, p. 566;

C.S.1922, § 7710;

C.S.1929, § 48-429;

R.S.1943, § 48-433;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 285.